Washington statutes.
RCW 35.54.050

Source—Surplus from improvement funds.

If in any local improvement fund guaranteed by a local improvement guaranty fund there is a surplus remaining after the payment of all outstanding bonds and warrants payable therefrom, it shall be paid into the local improvement guaranty fund.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.54.050. Prior: 1933 c 109 s 1, part; 1927 c 209 s 3, part; 1925 ex.s. c 183 s 3, part; 1923 c 141 s 3, part; RRS s 9351-3, part.]